Illinois, session 104th, HB3720.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Meaningful Human Review of Artificial Intelligence Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act: 7    "Automated decision-making system" means any software that 8uses algorithms, computational models, or artificial 9intelligence techniques, or a combination thereof, to 10automate, support, or replace human decision-making. 11"Automated decision-making system" includes, without 12limitation, systems that process data and apply predefined 13rules or machine learning algorithms to analyze such data and 14generate conclusions, recommendations, outcomes, assumptions, 15projections, or predictions without meaningful human 16discretion. "Automated decision-making system" does not 17include any software used primarily for basic computerized 18processes, such as calculators, spellcheck tools, autocorrect 19functions, spreadsheets, electronic communications, or any 20tool that relates only to internal management affairs, such as 21ordering office supplies or processing payments and that do 22not materially affect the rights, liberties, benefits, safety, 23or welfare of any individual within the State.   HB3720- 2 -LRB104 11304 BDA 21390 b1    "Meaningful human review" means review, oversight, and 2control of the automated decision-making process by one or 3more individuals who understand the risks, limitations, and 4functionality of, and are trained to use, the automated 5decision-making system and who have the authority to intervene 6or alter the decision under review, including, but not limited 7to, the ability to approve, deny, or modify any decision 8recommended or made by the automated system. 9    "State agency" means any Department, public authority, 10board, bureau, commission, division, office, council, 11committee, or officer of the State. 12    "Public assistance benefit" means any service or program 13within the control of the State or benefit provided by the 14State to individuals or households, including, but not limited 15to, public assistance, cash assistance, grants, child care 16assistance, housing assistance, unemployment benefits, 17transportation benefits, education assistance, domestic 18violence services, and any other assistance or benefit within 19the authority of the State to grant to individuals within the 20State. "Public assistance benefit" does not include any 21federal program that is administered by the federal government 22or the State. 23    Section 10. Use of automated decision-making systems by 24agencies. 25    (a) A State agency, or any entity acting on behalf of an   HB3720- 3 -LRB104 11304 BDA 21390 b1agency, shall not utilize or apply any automated 2decision-making system, directly or indirectly, without 3continuous meaningful human review when performing any 4function that: 5        (1) is related to the delivery of any public 6    assistance benefit; 7        (2) will have a material impact on the rights, civil 8    liberties, safety, or welfare of any individual within the 9    State; or 10        (3) affects any statutorily or constitutionally 11    provided right of an individual who shall use the 12    automated decision-making system unless the system is 13    subject to continuous meaningful human review. 14    (b) A State agency shall not authorize any procurement, 15purchase, or acquisition of any service or system utilizing, 16or relying on, automated decision-making systems in performing 17any function that is: 18        (1) related to the delivery of any public assistance 19    benefit; 20        (2) will have a material impact on the rights, civil 21    liberties, safety, or welfare of any individual within the 22    State; or 23        (3) affects any statutorily or constitutionally 24    provided right of an individual unless such automated 25    decision-making system is subject to continuous meaningful 26    human review.   HB3720- 4 -LRB104 11304 BDA 21390 b1    (c) The use of an automated decision-making system shall 2not affect: 3        (1) the existing rights of employees pursuant to an 4    existing collective bargaining agreement; or 5        (2) the existing representational relationships among 6    employee organizations or the bargaining relationships 7    between the employer and an employee organization. The use 8    of an automated decision-making system shall not result in 9    the: 10            (A) discharge, displacement, or loss of position, 11        including partial displacement, such as a reduction in 12        the hours of non-overtime work, wages, or employment 13        benefits, or result in the impairment of existing 14        collective bargaining agreements; 15            (B) transfer of existing duties and functions 16        currently performed by employees of the State or any 17        agency or public authority to an automated 18        decision-making system; or 19            (C) transfer of future duties and functions 20        ordinarily performed by employees of the State or any 21        agency or public authority. The use of an automated 22        decision-making system shall not alter the rights, 23        benefits, and privileges, including, but not limited 24        to, terms and conditions of employment, civil service 25        status, and collective bargaining unit membership 26        status of all existing employees of the State or any   HB3720- 5 -LRB104 11304 BDA 21390 b1        agency or public authority shall be preserved and 2        protected. 3    Section 15. Impact assessments. 4    (a) State agencies seeking to utilize or apply an 5automated decision-making system permitted under Section 10 of 6this Act with continuous meaningful human review shall conduct 7an impact assessment bearing the signature of one or more 8individuals responsible for meaningful human review for the 9lawful application and use of the automated decision-making 10system. Following the first impact assessment, an impact 11assessment shall be conducted in accordance with this Section 12at least once every 2 years. An impact assessment shall be 13conducted prior to any material change to the automated 14decision-making system that may change the outcome or effect 15of such system. Such impact assessments shall include: 16        (1) a description of the objectives of the automated 17    decision-making system;18        (2) an evaluation of the ability of the automated 19    decision-making system to achieve its stated objectives;20        (3) a description and evaluation of the objectives and 21    development of the automated decision-making including:22            (A) a summary of the underlying algorithms, 23        computational modes, and artificial intelligence tools 24        that are used within the automated decision-making 25        system; and  HB3720- 6 -LRB104 11304 BDA 21390 b1            (B) the design and training data used to develop 2        the automated decision-making system process; 3        (4) testing for: 4            (A) accuracy, fairness, bias, and discrimination 5        and an assessment of whether the use of the automated 6        decision-making system produces discriminatory results 7        on the basis of a consumer's or a class of consumers' 8        actual or perceived race, color, ethnicity, religion, 9        national origin, sex, gender, gender identity, sexual 10        orientation, familial status, biometric information, 11        lawful source of income, or disability and outlines 12        mitigations for any identified performance differences 13        in outcomes across relevant groups impacted by such 14        use; 15            (B) any cybersecurity vulnerabilities and privacy 16        risks resulting from the deployment and use of the 17        automated decision-making system and the development 18        or existence of safeguards to mitigate the risks;19            (C) any public health or safety risks resulting 20        from the deployment and use of the automated 21        decision-making system; 22            (D) any reasonably foreseeable misuse of the 23        automated decision-making system and the development 24        or existence of safeguards against such misuse; 25            (E) the extent to which the deployment and use of 26        the automated decision-making system requires input of   HB3720- 7 -LRB104 11304 BDA 21390 b1        sensitive and personal data, how that data is used and 2        stored, and any control users may have over their 3        data; and4        (5) the notification mechanism or procedure, if any, 5    by which individuals impacted by the utilization of the 6    automated decision-making system may be notified of the 7    use of such automated decision-making system and of the 8    individual's personal data, and informed of their rights 9    and options relating to such use. 10    (b) Notwithstanding applicable law, if an impact 11assessment finds that the automated decision-making system 12produces discriminatory or biased outcomes, the State agency 13shall cease any utilization, application, or function of such 14automated decision-making system and of any information 15produced using the system. 16    Section 20. Submission to the Governor and General 17Assembly. 18    (a) Each impact assessment conducted pursuant to this Act 19shall be submitted to the Governor, the President of the 20Senate, and the Speaker of the House at least 30 days prior to 21the implementation of the automated decision-making system 22that is the subject of such assessment.23    (b)(1) The impact assessment of an automated 24decision-making system shall be published on the Internet 25website of the relevant State agency.  HB3720- 8 -LRB104 11304 BDA 21390 b1    (2) If the State agency makes a determination that the 2disclosure of any information required in the impact 3assessment would result in a substantial negative impact on 4health or safety of the public, infringe upon the privacy 5rights of individuals, or significantly impair the State 6agency's ability to protect its information technology or 7operational assets, such State agency may redact such 8information, provided that an explanatory statement on the 9process by which the State agency made such determination is 10published along with the redacted impact assessment.11    (3) If the impact assessment covers any automated 12decision-making system that includes technology that is used 13to prevent, detect, protect against, or respond to security 14incidents, identity theft, fraud, harassment, malicious or 15deceptive activities, or other illegal activity; preserve the 16integrity or security of systems; or to investigate, report, 17or prosecute those responsible for any such malicious or 18deceptive action, a State agency may redact the information, 19so long as an explanatory statement on the process by which the 20State agency made such determination is published along with 21the redacted impact assessment.